District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2973.01

Establishment of Public School Modernization Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 201, 53 DCR 2843
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1010(e), 54 DCR 4102
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(o), 59 DCR 1862
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 264(a), 62 DCR 1884

History

D.C. Law 17-9 rewrote subsecs. (a), (b), (d), (f), and (g).
D.C. Law 19-124, in subsec. (f), substituted “§ 1-1162.24” for “§ 1-1106.02”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(o) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 264(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 264(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Emergency Legislation